Oklahoma, session 2025, SB750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-122.4 of Title 47, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Environmental Quality shall promulgate


rules to create the Canine Cooperative Grant Program to provide


financial assistance to state, county, and municipal law enforcement


entities and fire departments for the acquisition and training of


law enforcement canines and search, rescue, and recovery canines and


medical expenses for the canines related to injuries sustained while


in the line of service; provided, canines shall be trained in

Req. No. 315 Page 1


accordance with state law and agency standards and shall be


specifically allocated for law enforcement officers and fire


departments.


B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the Department of Environmental Quality to be designated


the “Canine Cooperative Grant Program Revolving Fund”. The fund


shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,


and shall consist of all monies received from legislative


appropriations, private donations, and federal grant programs. All


monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated


and may be budgeted and expended by the Department of Environmental


Quality for the administration of the Canine Cooperative Grant


Program. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment.


C. The Department of Environmental Quality may retain five


percent (5%) of the proceeds of the fund annually to be used for the


administration of the program.


D. Subject to the availability of funds, the program shall have


the following annual limits for grants:


1. Grants not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per


county sheriff for canine purchases or canine training;



Req. No. 315 Page 2


2. Grants not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per


municipal police department for canine purchases or canine training;


and


3. Grants not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per


fire department for canine purchases or canine training.


E. Subject to the availability of funds, the program shall make


grants for the reimbursement of medical expenses for canines injured


in the line of service with state, county, or municipal law


enforcement or a fire department.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-315 CN 1/19/2025 5:42:31 AM

























Req. No. 315 Page 3